de: Kompatible Renndisziplin: ATV/UTV; Autorennsport; BMX/MTB-Downhill; Kartsport; Motocross/Offroad; Motorrad-Straßenrennsport; Rallye; Schneemobil; Trackday/HPDE; Sonstige
cs: Kompatibilní závodní disciplína: ATV/UTV; Automobilové závody; BMX / MTB sjezd; Motokáry; Motokros / off-road; Silniční motocyklové závody; Rallye; Sněžné skútry; Závodní okruh / HPDE; Jiné
ja: 互換性のあるレース競技: ATV/UTV; オートレース; BMX/MTBダウンヒル; カート; モトクロス/オフロード; バイクロードレース; ラリー; スノーモービル; トラックデイ/HPDE; その他
th: ประเภทการแข่งขันที่เข้ากันได้: ATV/UTV; แข่งรถยนต์; BMX/MTB ดาวน์ฮิลล์; โกคาร์ท; โมโตครอส/ออฟโรด; แข่งรถจักรยานยนต์ทางเรียบ; แรลลี่; สโนว์โมบิล; แทร็กเดย์/HPDE; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 相容賽車項目: ATV/UTV; 賽車; BMX/MTB 下坡賽; 卡丁車; 越野摩托車/越野; 摩托車公路賽; 拉力賽; 雪上摩托車; 賽道日/HPDE; 其他
tr: Uyumlu yarış disiplini: ATV/UTV; Otomobil yarışı; BMX/MTB tepe inişi; Karting; Motokros/off-road; Motosiklet yol yarışı; Ralli; Kar motosikleti; Pist günü/HPDE; Diğer
it: disciplina di gara compatibile: ATV/UTV; Automobilismo; BMX/MTB downhill; Karting; Motocross/fuoristrada; Motociclismo su strada; Rally; Motoslitta; Track day/HPDE; Altro
pt-BR: Modalidade de corrida compatível: Quadriciclo (ATV) / UTV; Automobilismo; BMX / MTB downhill; Kart; Motocross/off-road; Motovelocidade; Rali; Snowmobile; Track day / HPDE; Outro
zh-CN: 适配赛车项目: ATV/UTV; 汽车赛事; BMX/MTB 速降; 卡丁车; 越野摩托车/越野; 摩托车公路赛; 拉力赛; 雪地摩托车; 赛道日/HPDE; 其他
da: Kompatibel racerkategori: ATV/UTV; Motorsport; BMX/MTB-downhill; Gokart; Motocross/offroad; Road racing (motorcykel); Rally; Snescooter; Trackday/HPDE; Andet
fr: Discipline de course compatible: Quad/SSV; Course automobile; Descente BMX/VTT; Karting; Motocross/tout-terrain; Course moto sur piste; Rallye; Motoneige; Roulage sur circuit/HPDE; Autre
pt-PT: Modalidade de corrida compatível: ATV/UTV; Automobilismo; BMX/BTT downhill; Karting; Motocross/todo-o-terreno; Corridas de motas de estrada; Rali; Mota de neve; Track day/HPDE; Outro
lt-LT: Suderinama lenktynių disciplina: Keturračiai / UTV; Automobilių lenktynės; BMX / MTB greitasis nusileidimas; Kartingai; Motokrosas / bekelė; Motociklų plento žiedinės lenktynės; Ralis; Sniego motociklai; Trasos diena / HPDE; Kita
nl: Compatibele racediscipline: ATV/UTV; Autosport; BMX/MTB downhill; Karting; Motorcross/offroad; Wegrace motorfietsen; Rally; Sneeuwscooter; Circuitdag/HPDE; Overig
hu: Kompatibilis versenyszakág: ATV/UTV; Autóversenyzés; BMX/MTB downhill; Gokartozás; Motocross/off-road; Gyorsasági motorversenyzés; Rali; Motoros szán; Pályanap/HPDE; Egyéb
hr-HR: Kompatibilna trkaća disciplina: ATV/UTV; Automoto utrke; BMX/MTB spust (downhill); Karting; Motokros/terenska vožnja; Cestovne moto utrke; Reli; Motorne sanjke; Track day / HPDE; Ostalo
sl-SI: Združljiva dirkaška disciplina: ATV/UTV; Avtomobilske dirke; Spust z BMX/MTB; Karting; Motokros/terenska vožnja; Cestne motoristične dirke; Reli; Motorne sani; Dan na dirkališču/HPDE; Drugo
el: Συμβατή αγωνιστική κατηγορία: ATV/UTV; Αγώνες αυτοκινήτου; BMX/MTB downhill; Καρτ; Motocross/off-road; Αγώνες μοτοσικλέτας σε πίστα; Ράλι; Snowmobile; Track day/HPDE; Άλλο
sv: Kompatibel tävlingsdisciplin: ATV/UTV; Bilsport; BMX/MTB downhill; Gokart; Motocross/offroad; Roadracing; Rally; Snöskoter; Trackday/HPDE; Övrigt
sk-SK: Kompatibilná pretekárska disciplína: ATV/UTV; Automobilové preteky; BMX/MTB zjazd; Motokáry; Motokros/off-road; Cestné preteky motocyklov; Rely; Snežné skútre; Track day/HPDE; Iné
bg-BG: Съвместима състезателна дисциплина: ATV/UTV; Автомобилни състезания; BMX/MTB спускане; Картинг; Мотокрос/off-road; Мотоциклетни състезания на писта; Рали; Моторни шейни; Трак дей (Track day)/HPDE; Друго
nb: Kompatibel racingdisiplin: ATV/UTV; Bilsport; BMX / MTB utfor; Gokart; Motocross/offroad; Motorsykkel roadracing; Rally; Snøscooter; Trackday/HPDE; Annet
en: Compatible racing discipline: ATV/UTV; Auto racing; BMX/MTB downhill; Karting; Motocross/off-road; Motorcycle road racing; Rally; Snowmobile; Track day/HPDE; Other
ro-RO: Disciplină de curse compatibilă: ATV/UTV; Curse auto; BMX / MTB downhill; Karting; Motocross/off-road; Curse moto pe circuit; Raliu; Snowmobil; Track day / HPDE; Altele
pl: Kompatybilna dyscyplina wyścigowa: ATV / UTV; Wyścigi samochodowe; Zjazd BMX / MTB; Karting; Motocross / off-road; Motocyklowe wyścigi drogowe; Rajdy; Skutery śnieżne; Dni na torze / HPDE; Inne
fi: Yhteensopiva kilpalaji: ATV / UTV; Autourheilu; BMX / alamäkiajo (MTB); Karting; Motocross / maastoajo; Moottoripyörien ratamoottoripyöräily; Ralli; Moottorikelkkailu; Rata-ajo / HPDE; Muu
ru: Совместимая гоночная дисциплина: ATV/UTV; Автоспорт; Даунхилл (BMX / MTB); Картинг; Мотокросс / бездорожье; Шоссейно-кольцевые мотогонки; Ралли; Снегоходы; Трек-дни / HPDE; Другое
es: Disciplina de carreras compatible: ATV/UTV; Automovilismo; Descenso BMX/MTB; Karting; Motocross/todoterreno; Carreras de motos de asfalto; Rally; Motonieve; Día de pista/HPDE; Otro
ko: 호환 레이싱 종목: ATV/UTV; 자동차 경주; BMX/MTB 다운힐; 카트; 모터크로스/오프로드; 모터사이클 로드 레이싱; 랠리; 스노모빌; 트랙 데이/HPDE; 기타
vi: Bộ môn đua xe tương thích: ATV/UTV; Đua ô tô; BMX/MTB đổ đèo; Đua kart; Motocross/địa hình; Đua xe máy đường nhựa; Đua rally; Xe trượt tuyết; Chạy trong đường đua (Track day/HPDE); Khác